Hawaii statutes.
§187A-8 Cooperation with other governmental
authorities. The department shall endeavor to secure the cooperation and
assistance of and shall cooperate with the appropriate agency of the United
States or other governmental authorities having an interest in the subject
matter of title 12, in every way possible, for the promotion of the purposes of
title 12. More specifically, the department may permit the appropriate agency
of the United States or other governmental authorities to occupy any land or
building and use any appliance, apparatus, or property held or controlled by
the department, either independently or in conjunction with the department,
upon such terms and conditions as the department and the agency may mutually
agree. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next